Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-1105
Award; payment; rights acquired; limitation on determination on appeal.

Upon the determination of the amount by the Board of Educational Lands and Funds or governing body, the applicant shall pay the amount to the treasurer of the county in which such lands are situated, for the use of the permanent school fund of this state, if such lands are school lands; as to other public lands such payment shall be made to the State Treasurer for the use of the board or other governing body having title or supervision over such lands. Upon making said payment the applicant shall be vested with the right to lay, relay, operate and maintain such pipeline through the lands described in the proceedings, notwithstanding any appeal as taken or authorized by section 57-1104. Upon appeal the district court shall determine only the amount of the award and not whether a right-of-way is granted.

Laws 1963, c. 323, § 5, p. 981.